Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.55.030

Statement of financial affairs—Contents. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5143-S.SL) ***

(1) The statement of financial affairs required by RCW 29B.55.010 shall disclose the following information for the reporting individual and each member of the reporting individual's immediate family:

(a) Occupation, name of employer, and business address;

(b) Each bank account, savings account, and insurance policy in which a direct financial interest was held that exceeds *twenty thousand dollars at any time during the reporting period; each other item of intangible personal property in which a direct financial interest was held that exceeds *two thousand dollars during the reporting period; the name, address, and nature of the entity; and the nature and highest value of each direct financial interest during the reporting period;

(c) The name and address of each creditor to whom the value of *two thousand dollars or more was owed; the original amount of each debt to each creditor; the amount of each debt owed to each creditor as of the date of filing; the terms of repayment of each debt; and the security given, if any, for each such debt. Debts arising from a "retail installment transaction" as defined in chapter 63.14 RCW (retail installment sales act) need not be reported;

(d) Every public or private office, directorship, and position held as trustee; except that an elected official or executive state officer need not report the elected official's or executive state officer's service on a governmental board, commission, association, or functional equivalent, when such service is part of the elected official's or executive state officer's official duties;

(e) All persons for whom any legislation, rule, rate, or standard has been prepared, promoted, or opposed for current or deferred compensation. For the purposes of this subsection, "compensation" does not include payments made to the person reporting by the governmental entity for which the person serves as an elected official or state executive officer or professional staff member for the person's service in office; the description of such actual or proposed legislation, rules, rates, or standards; and the amount of current or deferred compensation paid or promised to be paid;

(f) The name and address of each governmental entity, corporation, partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, association, union, or other business or commercial entity from whom compensation has been received in any form of a total value of *two thousand dollars or more; the value of the compensation; and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation;

(g) The name of any corporation, partnership, joint venture, association, union, or other entity in which is held any office, directorship, or any general partnership interest, or an ownership interest of ten percent or more; the name or title of that office, directorship, or partnership; the nature of ownership interest; and: (i) With respect to a governmental unit in which the official seeks or holds any office or position, if the entity has received compensation in any form during the preceding twelve months from the governmental unit, the value of the compensation and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation; and (ii) the name of each governmental unit, corporation, partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, association, union, or other business or commercial entity from which the entity has received compensation in any form in the amount of *ten thousand dollars or more during the preceding twelve months and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation. As used in (g)(ii) of this subsection, "compensation" does not include payment for water and other utility services at rates approved by the Washington state utilities and transportation commission or the legislative authority of the public entity providing the service. With respect to any bank or commercial lending institution in which is held any office, directorship, partnership interest, or ownership interest, it shall only be necessary to report either the name, address, and occupation of every director and officer of the bank or commercial lending institution and the average monthly balance of each account held during the preceding twelve months by the bank or commercial lending institution from the governmental entity for which the individual is an official or candidate or professional staff member, or all interest paid by a borrower on loans from and all interest paid to a depositor by the bank or commercial lending institution if the interest exceeds *two thousand four hundred dollars;

(h) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds *ten thousand dollars in which any direct financial interest was acquired during the preceding calendar year, and a statement of the amount and nature of the financial interest and of the consideration given in exchange for that interest;

(i) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds *ten thousand dollars in which any direct financial interest was divested during the preceding calendar year, and a statement of the amount and nature of the consideration received in exchange for that interest, and the name and address of the person furnishing the consideration;

(j) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds *ten thousand dollars in which a direct financial interest was held. If a description of the property has been included in a report previously filed, the property may be listed, for purposes of this subsection (1)(j), by reference to the previously filed report;

(k) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds *twenty thousand dollars, in which a corporation, partnership, firm, enterprise, or other entity had a direct financial interest, in which corporation, partnership, firm, or enterprise a ten percent or greater ownership interest was held;

(l) A list of each occasion, specifying date, donor, and amount, at which food and beverage in excess of fifty dollars was accepted under RCW 42.52.150(5);

(m) A list of each occasion, specifying date, donor, and amount, at which items specified in RCW 42.52.010(9) (d) and (f) were accepted; and

(n) Such other information as the commission may deem necessary in order to properly carry out the purposes and policies of this title, as the commission shall prescribe by rule.

(2)(a) When judges, prosecutors, sheriffs, participants in the address confidentiality program under RCW 40.24.030, or their immediate family members are required to disclose real property that is the personal residence of the judge, prosecutor, sheriff, or address confidentiality program participant, the requirements of subsection (1)(h) through (k) of this section may be satisfied for that property by substituting:

(i) The city or town;

(ii) The type of residence, such as a single-family or multifamily residence, and the nature of ownership; and

(iii) Such other identifying information the commission prescribes by rule for the mailing address where the property is located.

(b) Nothing in this subsection relieves the judge, prosecutor, or sheriff of any other applicable obligations to disclose potential conflicts or to recuse oneself.

(3)(a) Where an amount is required to be reported under subsection (1)(a) through (m) of this section, it may be reported within a range as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b)

Code A

Less than thirty thousand dollars;

Code B

At least thirty thousand dollars, but less than sixty thousand dollars;

Code C

At least sixty thousand dollars, but less than one hundred thousand dollars;

Code D

At least one hundred thousand dollars, but less than two hundred thousand dollars;

Code E

At least two hundred thousand dollars, but less than five hundred thousand dollars;

Code F

At least five hundred thousand dollars, but less than seven hundred and fifty thousand dollars;

Code G

At least seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, but less than one million dollars; or

Code H

One million dollars or more.

(c) An amount of stock may be reported by number of shares instead of by market value. No provision of this subsection may be interpreted to prevent any person from filing more information or more detailed information than required.

(4) Items of value given to an official's or employee's spouse, domestic partner, or family member are attributable to the official or employee, except the item is not attributable if an independent business, family, or social relationship exists between the donor and the spouse, domestic partner, or family member.

[ 2024 c 164 s 488; 2023 c 462 s 502; 2019 c 428 s 36; 2010 c 204 s 903; 2008 c 6 s 202; 1995 c 397 s 9; 1984 c 34 s 3; 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 42. Formerly RCW 42.17A.710, 42.17.241.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The dollar amounts in this section may have been adjusted for inflation by rule of the commission adopted under the authority of RCW 29B.20.050. For current dollar amounts, see WAC 390-24-301.

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2019 c 428 ss 35 and 36: See note following RCW 29B.55.010.

Finding—2019 c 428: See note following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Effective date—1995 c 397: See note following RCW 29B.40.020.

Purpose—1979 ex.s. c 126: See RCW 29A.60.280(1).